Utah statutes.
63M-1-3001.   Legislative intent.

It is the intent of the Legislature to establish procedures to most effectively and equitably allocate this state's private activity bond volume cap authorized by the Internal Revenue Code of 1986 in order to maximize the social and economic benefits to this state.

